Colorado, session 2026A, HB1036.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 29-2-117 as
follows:
29-2-117. Authority to levy excise tax on vacant residential
units - county - municipality - election - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "SHORT-TERM RENTAL UNIT" MEANS A BUILDING THAT:
(I) IS LICENSED AS A SHORT-TERM RENTAL UNIT WITHIN THE
COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY, OR LOCAL HOUSING TAX AUTHORITY IMPOSING A
TAX PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION; OR
(II) (A) IS DESIGNED FOR USE PREDOMINANTLY AS A PLACE OF
-2- HB26-1036

RESIDENCY BY A PERSON, A FAMILY, OR FAMILIES; AND
(B) IS AVAILABLE TO BE LEASED FOR ONE OR MORE SHORT-TERM
STAYS.
(b) "SHORT-TERM STAY" MEANS OVERNIGHT LODGING THAT IS
PROVIDED TO AN INDIVIDUAL OR BUSINESS FOR LESS THAN THIRTY
CONSECUTIVE DAYS IN EXCHANGE FOR MONETARY PAYMENT.
(c) "VACANT RESIDENTIAL UNIT" MEANS A BUILDING THAT:
(I) IS DESIGNED FOR USE PREDOMINANTLY AS A PLACE OF
RESIDENCY BY A PERSON, A FAMILY, OR FAMILIES;
(II) IS UNOCCUPIED AND NOT USED AS A RESIDENCE FOR A
SPECIFIED AMOUNT OF TIME, AS DETERMINED BY THE COUNTY,
MUNICIPALITY, OR LOCAL HOUSING TAX AUTHORITY IMPOSING A TAX
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION; AND
(III) IS NOT A SHORT-TERM RENTAL UNIT.
(2) (a) EACH COUNTY IN THE STATE IS AUTHORIZED TO LEVY,
COLLECT, AND ENFORCE A COUNTY EXCISE TAX ON ALL VACANT
RESIDENTIAL UNITS WITHIN THE COUNTY, OR ANY SUBSET THEREOF, AS
PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION (2); EXCEPT THAT A COUNTY IS NOT
AUTHORIZED TO LEVY, COLLECT, AND ENFORCE A COUNTY EXCISE TAX
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) WITHIN A MUNICIPALITY UNLESS AN
AGREEMENT EXISTS BETWEEN THE COUNTY AND MUNICIPALITY TO IMPOSE
THE TAX WITHIN THE MUNICIPAL BOUNDARIES. A COUNTY IS AUTHORIZED
TO LEVY, COLLECT, AND ENFORCE AN EXCISE TAX PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2) IN UNINCORPORATED AREAS OF THE COUNTY. A COUNTY
IS AUTHORIZED TO LEVY, COLLECT, AND ENFORCE AN EXCISE TAX
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) AS A FLAT RATE ON ALL VACANT
RESIDENTIAL UNITS WITHIN THE COUNTY, OR ANY SUBSET THEREOF, OR
-3- HB26-1036

BASED ON THE UNIT TYPE, NUMBER OF BEDROOMS, OR SQUARE FOOTAGE
OF THE UNIT.
(b) A COUNTY SHALL NOT LEVY AN EXCISE TAX PURSUANT TO THE
PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION UNTIL THE PROPOSAL
HAS BEEN REFERRED TO AND APPROVED BY THE ELIGIBLE ELECTORS OF
THE COUNTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF ARTICLE X,
SECTION 20 OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION. THE ADOPTION PROCEDURES
FOR A COUNTYWIDE SALES TAX, USE TAX, OR BOTH, AS SPECIFIED IN THIS
ARTICLE 2, APPLY TO THE REFERRAL AND APPROVAL OF AN EXCISE TAX
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2). A PROPOSAL FOR A COUNTY EXCISE
TAX PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION MUST CONTAIN A
DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPOSED TAX, MUST STATE THE AMOUNT TO BE
IMPOSED, AND MUST DESCRIBE THE AREA WITHIN THE COUNTY IN WHICH
THE TAX WILL BE IMPOSED.
(3) (a) EACH MUNICIPALITY IN THE STATE IS AUTHORIZED TO LEVY,
COLLECT, AND ENFORCE A MUNICIPAL EXCISE TAX ON ALL VACANT
RESIDENTIAL UNITS WITHIN THE MUNICIPALITY, OR ANY SUBSET THEREOF,
AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3). A MUNICIPALITY IS AUTHORIZED TO
LEVY, COLLECT, AND ENFORCE AN EXCISE TAX PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (3) AS A FLAT RATE ON ALL VACANT RESIDENTIAL UNITS
WITHIN THE MUNICIPALITY, OR ANY SUBSET THEREOF, OR BASED ON THE
UNIT TYPE, NUMBER OF BEDROOMS, OR SQUARE FOOTAGE OF THE UNIT.
(b) A MUNICIPALITY SHALL NOT LEVY AN EXCISE TAX PURSUANT
TO THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION UNTIL THE
PROPOSAL HAS BEEN REFERRED TO AND APPROVED BY THE ELIGIBLE
ELECTORS OF THE MUNICIPALITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF ARTICLE X, SECTION 20 OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
-4- HB26-1036

A PROPOSAL FOR A MUNICIPAL EXCISE TAX PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(3)(a) OF THIS SECTION MUST CONTAIN A DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPOSED
TAX AND THE AMOUNT TO BE IMPOSED.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL NOT COLLECT,
ADMINISTER, OR ENFORCE AN EXCISE TAX IMPOSED BY A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND, INSTEAD, THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY IMPOSING THE TAX SHALL COLLECT, ADMINISTER, AND
ENFORCE THE EXCISE TAX. A MUNICIPALITY MAY COLLECT, ADMINISTER,
AND ENFORCE THE EXCISE TAX ACCORDING TO PART 1 OF ARTICLE 20 OF
TITLE 31, INCLUDING CERTIFYING DELINQUENT CHARGES, ASSESSMENTS,
OR TAXES TO THE TREASURER OF THE COUNTY PURSUANT TO SECTION
31-20-105.
(5) ONE OR MORE COUNTIES OR MUNICIPALITIES MAY FORM A
LOCAL HOUSING TAX AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO PART 13 OF ARTICLE 4 OF
THIS TITLE 29 TO COLLABORATE ON A COORDINATED ELECTION TO
APPROVE THE LEVY OF AN EXCISE TAX PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND ON
THE COLLECTION, ADMINISTRATION, AND ENFORCEMENT OF AN APPROVED
TAX.
(6) (a) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY IN WHICH THE ELIGIBLE
ELECTORS HAVE APPROVED THE LEVY OF AN EXCISE TAX PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION MAY CREDIT THE REVENUES COLLECTED FROM THE TAX TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY OR TO ANY SPECIAL
FUND CREATED IN THE COUNTY'S OR MUNICIPALITY'S TREASURY.
(b) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY USE THE REVENUES
COLLECTED FROM AN EXCISE TAX IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION
ONLY FOR AFFORDABLE, ATTAINABLE, OR WORKFORCE HOUSING, AS
DEFINED BY THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY. TO THE EXTENT THAT A
-5- HB26-1036

COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY IS REQUIRED TO CONDUCT A HOUSING NEEDS
ASSESSMENT PURSUANT TO PART 37 OF ARTICLE 32 OF TITLE 24, THE
REVENUES COLLECTED FROM THE TAX MUST BE USED TO SUPPORT A
DEMONSTRATED NEED IDENTIFIED IN THE COUNTY'S OR MUNICIPALITY'S
MOST RECENT HOUSING NEEDS ASSESSMENT.
(7) A COUNTY ASSESSOR HAS NO DUTY IN IMPLEMENTING A TAX
ASSESSED AND LEVIED BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION. IN AN ASSESSOR'S DISCRETION, THE ASSESSOR MAY ASSIST BY
PROVIDING DATA AND INFORMATION TO A COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY, OR
LOCAL HOUSING TAX AUTHORITY, AND MAY ENTER INTO AN
INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENT THAT PROVIDES FOR COMPENSATION
IN EXCHANGE FOR THE ASSESSOR'S ASSISTANCE.
(8) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHOULD BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT
THE POWERS OF HOME RULE MUNICIPALITIES ORGANIZED UNDER THE
PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE XX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 13 to article
4 of title 29 as follows:
PART 13
LOCAL HOUSING TAX AUTHORITIES
29-4-1301. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 13, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "GOVERNING BODY" MEANS THE BOARD OF COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS OF A COUNTY OR THE CITY COUNCIL OF A CITY, THE
BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF A TOWN, OR ANY OTHER BODY BY WHATEVER
NAME KNOWN THAT IS GIVEN LAWFUL AUTHORITY TO ADOPT ORDINANCES
FOR A SPECIFIC MUNICIPALITY.
-6- HB26-1036

(2) "LOCAL GOVERNMENT" MEANS ANY COUNTY, CITY AND
COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY.
(3) "LOCAL HOUSING TAX AUTHORITY" OR "AUTHORITY" MEANS
A CORPORATE BODY ORGANIZED PURSUANT TO THIS PART 13.
29-4-1302. Local housing tax authority - formation - powers
and purpose - intergovernmental agreement.
(1) (a) THE GOVERNING BODY OF TWO OR MORE LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS THAT SHARE TERRITORY OR HAVE CONTIGUOUS
BOUNDARIES MAY ENTER INTO AN INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENT TO
CREATE AN AUTHORITY THAT IS AUTHORIZED TO EXERCISE THE FUNCTIONS
CONFERRED BY THE PROVISIONS OF THIS PART 13.
(b) THE PURPOSE OF THIS PART 13 IS TO ALLOW TWO OR MORE
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS TO FORM A JOINT TAXING AUTHORITY TO
COLLECTIVELY ESTABLISH, LEVY, COLLECT, AND ENFORCE TAXES ON
VACANT RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, AS PROVIDED IN SECTIONS 29-2-117 AND
39-1-104.8, WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF AN AUTHORITY.
(c) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL NOT ENTER INTO AN
INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENT TO CREATE AN AUTHORITY WITHOUT
HOLDING AT LEAST TWO PUBLIC HEARINGS THEREON, IN ADDITION TO
OTHER REQUIREMENTS IMPOSED BY LAW FOR PUBLIC NOTICE. THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SHALL GIVE NOTICE OF THE TIME, PLACE, AND PURPOSE OF
THE PUBLIC HEARING BY PUBLICATION IN A NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL
CIRCULATION IN THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR ON A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE
WEBSITE AT LEAST TEN DAYS PRIOR TO THE DATE OF THE PUBLIC HEARING.
(2) AN INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENT THAT CREATES AN
AUTHORITY MUST INCLUDE:
(a) THE NAME AND PURPOSE OF THE AUTHORITY;
-7- HB26-1036

(b) PROVISIONS FOR THE LEVY, COLLECTION, ENFORCEMENT, AND
APPORTIONMENT OF REVENUE OF AN EXCISE OR PROPERTY TAX
AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION;
(c) THE ESTABLISHMENT AND ORGANIZATION OF A BOARD OF
DIRECTORS IN WHICH ALL LEGISLATIVE POWER OF THE AUTHORITY IS
VESTED, INCLUDING:
(I) THE NUMBER OF DIRECTORS;
(II) THE MANNER OF THE ELECTION OR APPOINTMENT, THE
QUALIFICATIONS, AND THE COMPENSATION, IF ANY, OF THE DIRECTORS
AND THE PROCEDURE FOR FILLING VACANCIES;
(III) THE OFFICERS OF THE DISTRICT, THE MANNER OF THEIR
APPOINTMENT, AND THEIR DUTIES; AND
(IV) THE VOTING REQUIREMENTS FOR ACTION BY THE BOARD;
EXCEPT THAT, UNLESS SPECIFICALLY PROVIDED OTHERWISE IN THE
INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENT, A MAJORITY OF THE DIRECTORS OF
THE BOARD CONSTITUTES A QUORUM AND IS NECESSARY FOR ACTION BY
THE BOARD;
(d) THE BOUNDARIES OF THE AUTHORITY, WHICH MAY NOT
INCLUDE:
(I) TERRITORY WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF A MUNICIPALITY THAT
IS NOT A MEMBER OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENTS FORMING THE AUTHORITY,
AS THE BOUNDARIES OF THE MUNICIPALITY EXIST ON THE DATE THE
AUTHORITY IS CREATED, WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE GOVERNING BODY
OF THE MUNICIPALITY; OR
(II) TERRITORY WITHIN THE UNINCORPORATED BOUNDARIES OF A
COUNTY THAT IS NOT A MEMBER OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENTS FORMING
THE AUTHORITY, AS THE UNINCORPORATED BOUNDARIES OF THE COUNTY
-8- HB26-1036

EXIST ON THE DATE THE AUTHORITY IS CREATED, WITHOUT THE CONSENT
OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE COUNTY;
(e) THE CONDITIONS FOR ADDING OR REMOVING A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT PARTY TO THE INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENT;
(f) THE TERM OF THE AUTHORITY, WHICH MAY BE FOR A DEFINITE
TERM OR UNTIL DISSOLVED, AND THE METHOD, IF ANY, BY WHICH IT MAY
BE DISSOLVED;
(g) PROVISIONS FOR AMENDMENT OF THE INTERGOVERNMENTAL
AGREEMENT; AND
(h) THE LIMITATIONS, IF ANY, ON THE POWERS GRANTED BY THIS
SECTION THAT MAY BE EXERCISED BY THE AUTHORITY.
(3) AN AUTHORITY CREATED PURSUANT TO THIS PART 13 IS A
SEPARATE LEGAL ENTITY AND HAS THE POWERS DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
29-1-203 AND 29-1-203.5 AND ALL THE POWERS NECESSARY OR
CONVENIENT TO CARRY OUT AND EFFECTUATE THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART
13, INCLUDING THE POWER TO:
(a) SUE AND TO BE SUED;
(b) ADOPT AND ALTER A SEAL;
(c) HAVE PERPETUAL SUCCESSION;
(d) MAKE, AND FROM TIME TO TIME AMEND AND REPEAL, BYLAWS,
ORDERS, RULES, AND REGULATIONS TO EFFECTUATE THE PROVISIONS OF
THIS PART 13;
(e) MAKE LOANS, WHICH MAY BE SECURED BY LOAN AND SECURITY
AGREEMENTS, LEASES, OR ANY OTHER INSTRUMENTS UPON THE TERMS
AND CONDITIONS DETERMINED BY THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE
AUTHORITY;
(f) ISSUE BONDS, NOTES, OR OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS
-9- HB26-1036

PAYABLE SOLELY FROM REVENUES OR OTHER AVAILABLE MONEY OF THE
AUTHORITY. THE TERMS, CONDITIONS, AND DETAILS OF THE BONDS,
NOTES, OR OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS, AS DETERMINED BY THE
BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE AUTHORITY, MUST BE SET FORTH IN THE
SECURITY AGREEMENT UNDER WHICH THE BONDS, NOTES, OR OTHER
FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS ARE ISSUED.
(g) COORDINATE AN ELECTION TO APPROVE A LOCAL EXCISE TAX
ON VACANT RESIDENTIAL UNITS, AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 29-2-117,
WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF THE AUTHORITY;
(h) LEVY, COLLECT, AND ENFORCE A LOCAL EXCISE TAX ON
VACANT RESIDENTIAL UNITS, AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 29-2-117, WITHIN
THE BOUNDARIES OF THE AUTHORITY ACCORDING TO THE TERMS OF AN
INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENT AMONG THE MEMBER LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS;
(i) COORDINATE AN ELECTION TO APPROVE A LOCAL AD VALOREM
PROPERTY TAX ON VACANT RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, AS PROVIDED IN
SECTION 39-1-104.8, WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF THE AUTHORITY;
(j) ASSESS, LEVY, COLLECT, AND ENFORCE A LOCAL AD VALOREM
PROPERTY TAX ON VACANT RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, AS PROVIDED IN
SECTION 39-1-104.8, WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF THE AUTHORITY
ACCORDING TO THE TERMS OF AN INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENT
AMONG THE MEMBER LOCAL GOVERNMENTS;
(k) CAUSE DELINQUENT TAXES MADE OR LEVIED BY THE
AUTHORITY TO BE CERTIFIED TO A TREASURER OF A COUNTY AND BE
COLLECTED AND PAID OVER BY THE TREASURER OF THE COUNTY IN THE
MANNER PROVIDED FOR IN THE INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENT; AND
(l) MAKE AND EXECUTE ANY AND ALL CONTRACTS,
-10- HB26-1036

INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENTS, AND OTHER INSTRUMENTS THAT IT
MAY DEEM NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT TO THE EXERCISE OF ITS POWERS
PURSUANT TO THIS PART 13.
(4) ARTICLES 10.5 AND 47 OF TITLE 11 APPLY TO THE MONEY OF AN
AUTHORITY.
(5) (a) IN THE EVENT THAT PROPERTY WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF
THE AUTHORITY MUST BE EXCLUDED FROM THE AUTHORITY DUE TO THE
PROPERTY'S ANNEXATION TO A LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT IS NOT A PARTY
TO THE INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENT THAT FORMED THE
AUTHORITY, THE AUTHORITY'S BOARD OF DIRECTORS SHALL CREATE A
PLAN TO EXCLUDE THAT PROPERTY FROM THE BOUNDARIES OF THE
AUTHORITY. THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS SHALL INCLUDE IN THE PLAN:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPERTY TO BE EXCLUDED;
(II) THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE EXCLUSION OF THE PROPERTY;
AND
(III) ANY OTHER CONDITIONS AND OBLIGATIONS, ON THE
AUTHORITY OR THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT IS NOT A PARTY TO THE
INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENT THAT FORMED THE AUTHORITY, THAT
ARE NECESSARY TO PERMIT THE EXCLUSION OF THE PROPERTY FROM THE
AUTHORITY.
(b) PROPERTY EXCLUDED FROM THE BOUNDARIES OF AN
AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5) IS SUBJECT TO THE LEVY
OF TAXES BY THE AUTHORITY FOR THE PAYMENT OF THE PROPERTY'S
PROPORTIONATE SHARE OF ANY INDEBTEDNESS OF THE AUTHORITY AND
THE INTEREST THEREON THAT EXISTED IMMEDIATELY PRIOR TO THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE EXCLUSION.
(c) THE CHANGE OF BOUNDARIES OF AN AUTHORITY CAUSED BY AN
-11- HB26-1036

EXCLUSION OF PROPERTY PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5) DOES NOT
IMPAIR OR AFFECT THE AUTHORITY'S ORGANIZATION OR ANY EXISTING
CONTRACT, OBLIGATION, LIEN, OR CHARGE.
(6) AN AUTHORITY THAT COORDINATES AN ELECTION AS
AUTHORIZED BY THIS SECTION SHALL CONDUCT THE ELECTION IN
SUBSTANTIALLY THE SAME MANNER AS MUNICIPAL OR COUNTY ELECTIONS,
AS APPROPRIATE, AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION
20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION. THE MUNICIPAL OR
COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER OF EACH LOCAL GOVERNMENT IN WHICH
THE ELECTION IS CONDUCTED SHALL ASSIST THE AUTHORITY IN
CONDUCTING THE ELECTION.
(7) ANY PUBLIC BODY, FOR THE PURPOSE OF AIDING AN AUTHORITY
WHOSE BOUNDARIES ARE SITUATED IN WHOLE OR IN PART WITHIN THE
AREA IN WHICH THE PUBLIC BODY IS AUTHORIZED TO ACT, UPON TERMS AS
THE PUBLIC BODY DETERMINES, MAY:
(a) DO EVERYTHING NECESSARY TO AID OR COOPERATE WITH THE
AUTHORITY IN CONNECTION WITH THE PLANNING OR UNDERTAKING OF
ANY ACTIVITIES IN FURTHERANCE OF THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 13; AND
(b) ENTER INTO AGREEMENTS WITH THE AUTHORITY RESPECTING
ACTION TO BE TAKEN PURSUANT TO ANY OF THE POWERS SET FORTH IN
THIS PART 13.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 39-1-104.8 as
follows:
39-1-104.8. Authority to levy and assess additional ad valorem
tax on vacant residential real property - county - municipality -
election - legislative declaration - definitions.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT A
-12- HB26-1036

COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL AD VALOREM TAX DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION
THAT IS ASSESSED AND LEVIED ON REAL PROPERTY CLASSIFIED AS VACANT
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY DOES NOT VIOLATE THE UNIFORMITY CLAUSE OF
ARTICLE X, SECTION 3 (1)(a) OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION BECAUSE IT IS
A REASONABLE CLASSIFICATION BASED ON THE NATURE OF THE PROPERTY
AND ALL PROPERTIES WITHIN THIS CLASS ARE UNIFORMLY TAXED WITHIN
THE TAXING JURISDICTION, AS DESCRIBED IN SENIOR CORP. V. BOARD OF
ASSESSMENT APPEALS, 702 P.2d 732, 738 (COLO. 1985), AND JENSEN V.
DENVER, 806 P.2d 381, 384 (COLO. 1991).
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "SHORT-TERM RENTAL PROPERTY" MEANS PROPERTY THAT:
(I) IS LICENSED AS A SHORT-TERM RENTAL UNIT WITHIN THE
COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY, OR LOCAL HOUSING TAX AUTHORITY IMPOSING A
TAX PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION; OR
(II) (A) IS DESIGNED FOR USE PREDOMINANTLY AS A PLACE OF
RESIDENCY BY A PERSON, A FAMILY, OR FAMILIES; AND
(B) IS AVAILABLE TO BE LEASED FOR ONE OR MORE SHORT-TERM
STAYS.
(b) "SHORT-TERM STAY" MEANS OVERNIGHT LODGING THAT IS
PROVIDED TO AN INDIVIDUAL OR BUSINESS FOR LESS THAN THIRTY
CONSECUTIVE DAYS IN EXCHANGE FOR MONETARY PAYMENT.
(c) "VACANT RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY" MEANS PROPERTY THAT:
(I) IS DESIGNED FOR USE PREDOMINANTLY AS A PLACE OF
RESIDENCY BY A PERSON, A FAMILY, OR FAMILIES;
(II) IS UNOCCUPIED AND NOT USED AS A RESIDENCE FOR A
SPECIFIED AMOUNT OF TIME, AS DETERMINED BY THE COUNTY,
-13- HB26-1036

MUNICIPALITY, OR LOCAL HOUSING TAX AUTHORITY IMPOSING A TAX
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION; AND
(III) IS NOT SHORT-TERM RENTAL PROPERTY.
(3) (a) EACH COUNTY IN THE STATE IS AUTHORIZED TO ASSESS,
LEVY, COLLECT, AND ENFORCE AN AD VALOREM TAX ON RESIDENTIAL
REAL PROPERTY THAT IS CLASSIFIED BY THE COUNTY AS VACANT
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY. A TAX AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (3) IS IN ADDITION TO ANY AD VALOREM TAX ASSESSED ON
RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY IN THE COUNTY.
(b) A COUNTY SHALL NOT ASSESS OR LEVY AN AD VALOREM
PROPERTY TAX PURSUANT TO THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF
THIS SECTION UNTIL THE PROPOSAL HAS BEEN REFERRED TO AND
APPROVED BY THE ELIGIBLE ELECTORS OF THE COUNTY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF ARTICLE X, SECTION 20 OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
(4) (a) EACH MUNICIPALITY IN THE STATE IS AUTHORIZED TO
ASSESS, LEVY, COLLECT, AND ENFORCE AN AD VALOREM TAX ON
RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT IS CLASSIFIED BY THE MUNICIPALITY
AS VACANT RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY. A TAX AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS IN ADDITION TO ANY AD VALOREM TAX ASSESSED
ON RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY IN THE MUNICIPALITY.
(b) A MUNICIPALITY SHALL NOT ASSESS OR LEVY AN AD VALOREM
PROPERTY TAX PURSUANT TO THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF
THIS SECTION UNTIL THE PROPOSAL HAS BEEN REFERRED TO AND
APPROVED BY THE ELIGIBLE ELECTORS OF THE MUNICIPALITY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF ARTICLE X, SECTION 20 OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION.
-14- HB26-1036

(5) (a) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY THAT ASSESSES AND IMPOSES
AN AD VALOREM PROPERTY TAX PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION SHALL
COLLECT, ADMINISTER, AND ENFORCE THE TAX. A MUNICIPALITY MAY
COLLECT, ADMINISTER, AND ENFORCE THE TAX ACCORDING TO PART 1 OF
ARTICLE 20 OF TITLE 31, INCLUDING CERTIFYING DELINQUENT CHARGES,
ASSESSMENTS, OR TAXES TO THE TREASURER OF THE COUNTY PURSUANT
TO SECTION 31-20-105.
(b) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY THAT ASSESSES AND IMPOSES AN
AD VALOREM PROPERTY TAX PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MAY ESTABLISH
GUIDELINES FOR THE CLASSIFICATION OF REAL PROPERTY AS VACANT
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY.
(6) ONE OR MORE COUNTIES OR MUNICIPALITIES MAY FORM A
LOCAL HOUSING TAX AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO PART 13 OF ARTICLE 4 OF
TITLE 29 TO COLLABORATE ON A COORDINATED ELECTION TO APPROVE THE
ASSESSMENT AND LEVY OF AN AD VALOREM PROPERTY TAX PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION AND ON THE COLLECTION, ADMINISTRATION, AND
ENFORCEMENT OF AN APPROVED TAX.
(7) (a) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY IN WHICH THE ELIGIBLE
ELECTORS HAVE APPROVED THE LEVY OF AN AD VALOREM PROPERTY TAX
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MAY CREDIT THE REVENUES COLLECTED FROM
THE TAX TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY OR TO
ANY SPECIAL FUND CREATED IN THE COUNTY'S OR MUNICIPALITY'S
TREASURY.
(b) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY USE THE REVENUES
COLLECTED FROM A TAX IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION ONLY FOR
AFFORDABLE, ATTAINABLE, OR WORKFORCE HOUSING, AS DEFINED BY THE
COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY. TO THE EXTENT THAT A COUNTY OR
-15- HB26-1036

MUNICIPALITY IS REQUIRED TO CONDUCT A HOUSING NEEDS ASSESSMENT
PURSUANT TO PART 37 OF ARTICLE 32 OF TITLE 24, THE REVENUES
COLLECTED FROM THE TAX MUST BE USED TO SUPPORT A DEMONSTRATED
NEED IDENTIFIED IN THE COUNTY'S OR MUNICIPALITY'S MOST RECENT
HOUSING NEEDS ASSESSMENT.
(8) A COUNTY ASSESSOR HAS NO DUTY IN IMPLEMENTING A TAX
ASSESSED AND LEVIED BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION. IN AN ASSESSOR'S DISCRETION, THE ASSESSOR MAY ASSIST BY
PROVIDING DATA AND INFORMATION TO A COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY, OR
LOCAL HOUSING TAX AUTHORITY AND MAY ENTER INTO AN
INTERGOVERNMENTAL AGREEMENT THAT PROVIDES FOR COMPENSATION
IN EXCHANGE FOR THE ASSESSOR'S ASSISTANCE.
(9) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHOULD BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT
THE POWERS OF HOME RULE MUNICIPALITIES ORGANIZED UNDER THE
PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE XX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-16- HB26-1036